Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2370.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 302(a) and (b) and 316.1(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended to read:Section 302. Imposition of Tax.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (c), every resident individual, estate or trust shall be subject to, and shall pay for the privilege of receiving each of the classes of income hereinafter enumerated in section 303, a tax upon each dollar of income received by that resident during that resident's taxable year at the rate of:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), three and seven hundredths per cent.(2) For the time period beginning the first day of the first full month after the effective date of this paragraph and ending on the first day after the end of the sixth full month after the effective date of this paragraph, two and ninety-nine hundredths per cent.(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), every nonresident individual, estate or trust shall be subject to, and shall pay for the privilege of receiving each of the classes of income hereinafter enumerated in section 303 from sources within this Commonwealth, a tax upon each dollar of income received by that nonresident during that nonresident's taxable year at the rate of:(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), three and seven hundredths per cent.(2) For the time period beginning the first day of the first full month after the effective date of this paragraph and ending on the first day after the end of the sixth full month after the effective date of this paragraph, two and ninety-nine hundredths per cent.* * *Section 316.1. Requirement of Withholding Tax.--(a) Every employer maintaining an office or transacting business within this Commonwealth and making payment of compensation (i) to a resident individual, or (ii) to a nonresident individual taxpayer performing services on behalf of such employer within this Commonwealth, shall deduct and withhold from such compensation for each payroll period a tax computed in such manner as to result, so far as practicable, in withholding from 20260HB2370PN3159 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the employe's compensation during each calendar year, or portions of calendar years for periods subject to section 302(a)(2) or (b)(2), an amount substantially equivalent to the tax reasonably estimated to be due for such year or portion of calendar years with respect to such compensation. The method of determining the amount to be withheld shall be prescribed by regulations of the department.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20260HB2370PN3159 - 3 - 12345678910